Tennessee, session 114, HB1694.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Tennessee K-9 Emergency
Medical Care and Transport Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-12-103, is amended by adding
the following as new, appropriately designated subdivisions:
( ) "Ambulance service" has the same meaning as defined in § 68-140-302;
( ) "Canine first responder" means a dog:
(A) With specialized training, or being trained, for police, military, or
patrol work; detection work; or search-and-rescue; and
(B) Being used by and under the control of a federal, state, or local law
enforcement officer, railroad police officer commissioned pursuant to § 65-6-133,
or a member of the United States armed forces or of a reserve or Tennessee
national guard unit in the performance of the officer's or member's law
enforcement or military duties;
( ) "Emergency medical services personnel" has the same meaning as defined
in § 68-140-302;
( ) "Emergency veterinary medicine service director" means a licensed
veterinarian who provides veterinary medicine advice, direction, oversight, and
authorization to emergency medical services personnel at an ambulance service for
HB1694
010645
- 1 -

purposes of transporting and providing emergency veterinary medicine care to a canine
first responder that is injured in the line of duty;
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 63, Chapter 12, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) The board of veterinary medical examiners, in consultation with the
Tennessee emergency medical services board, shall promulgate rules, pursuant to the
Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to:
(1) Establish requirements for a licensed veterinarian to serve as an
emergency veterinary medicine service director; and
(2) Approve a program to train emergency medical services personnel to
transport and provide emergency care to a canine first responder injured in the
line of duty.
(b) A licensed veterinarian who meets the requirements established pursuant to
subdivision (a)(1) may serve as an emergency veterinary medicine service director for
an ambulance service.
(c) Upon successful completion of the training established pursuant to
subdivision (a)(2), and subject to the veterinary medicine advice, direction, oversight,
and authorization of an emergency veterinary medicine service director, emergency
medical services personnel may:
(1) Transport a canine first responder injured in the line of duty to a
veterinary clinic, veterinary hospital, or other similar facility, if there is no
individual who requires medical attention or transport at that time; and
(2) Provide emergency care to a canine first responder injured in the line
of duty while at the scene of the injury or while the canine first responder is being
transported pursuant to subdivision (c)(1).
- 2 - 010645

SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-12-133, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
(d) Emergency medical services personnel who transport or provide emergency
care to a canine first responder injured in the line of duty pursuant to Section 3 are not
required to be licensed under this chapter.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 68, Chapter 140, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section, "canine first responder" means a dog:
(1) With specialized training, or in the process of receiving specialized
training, for police, military, or patrol work; detection work; or search-and-rescue;
and
(2) Being used by and under the control of a federal, state, or local law
enforcement officer, railroad police officer commissioned pursuant to § 65-6-133,
or a member of the United States armed forces or of a reserve or Tennessee
national guard unit in the performance of the officer's or member's law
enforcement or military duties.
(b) Subject to Section 3, emergency medical services personnel may:
(1) Transport a canine first responder injured in the line of duty to a
veterinary clinic, veterinary hospital, or other similar facility, if there is no
individual who requires medical attention or transport at that time; and
(2) Provide emergency care to a canine first responder injured in the line
of duty while at the scene of the injury or while the canine first responder is being
transported pursuant to subdivision (b)(1).
(c) Emergency medical services personnel who act in good faith to provide
emergency care to a canine first responder pursuant to subdivision (b)(2) are immune
- 3 - 010645

from criminal and civil liability as it relates to any injury or harm caused to the injured
canine first responder. Emergency medical services personnel are also immune from
criminal and civil liability for refusing to provide care to or transport an injured canine first
responder.
SECTION 6. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 4 - 010645